Washington statutes.
RCW 9.18.150

Agreements outside state.

It shall be no defense to a prosecution under RCW 9.18.120 through 9.18.150 that a payment or promise of payment of any money, check, draft, or anything of value, or any other understanding or arrangement to eliminate unrestricted competitive bids was had or made outside of the state of Washington, if such work or improvement for which bids are called is to be done or performed within the state.

[ 1921 c 12 s 4; RRS s 2333-4.]